Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-191
Applicability to attorneys at law.

The provisions of the
Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act shall be applicable to attorneys
at law only to the extent and under such terms and conditions as the Supreme
Court determines to be necessary and appropriate. Certificates of organization
of limited liability companies organized to practice law shall contain such
provisions as may be appropriate to comply with applicable rules of the court.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 91.